src/fao-lex.txt
! ============================ !
! Main Faroese morphology file !
! ============================ !


Multichar_Symbols
+N +V +A +P +Adv
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Dat
+Msc +Fem +Neu
+Sg +Pl
+Def +Indef +Cmp +Sup 
+Prs +Prt
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg
+Inf +PrfPrc +PrsPrc +Sup +Imp

 g2 j2 v2

%^UUML %^IUML %^W %^JI %^EPH %^OEA %^GDEL %^JDEL %^RDEL
%^EIO %^OA %^WVV

%>

! ============ !
! Root lexicon !
! ============ !


LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Adjectives ;
Verbs ;


! =============== !
! Noun morphology !
! =============== !


! ----------------- !
! Basic noun lexica !
! ----------------- !

! Taken from the dictionary

! The nominal morphology is added in three layers.
! In this first one we add gender tags and morpho-
! phonological diacritics.
! The next two layers are for indefinite and definite
! suffixes, respectively.

! Weak masculines.

LEXICON k1 ! risi fg m5
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k2 ! beiggi
+N+Msc:%^JI W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k3 ! ! hagi
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k4 ! tanki
 k3 ;	! Same u-umlaut, but nasal cns

LEXICON k5 ! bóndi
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W-M-PLNOM-UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W-M-PLACC-UR ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;


! Strong masculines

LEXICON k6 ! úlvur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k7 ! sandur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k8 ! garður
 k7 ; ! Different u-umlaut
 
LEXICON k9
 k6 ; ! Double consonant deletion in front of s
 
LEXICON k10
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ; ! Double dative.
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k11 ! ísur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;


! ir-stems

LEXICON k12 ! vinur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k13 ! vegur
 k12 ; ! As k12, plus a zero dative
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;

LEXICON k14 ! staður
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k15 ! gestur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ; !s-gen
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k16
 k15 ; ! Double consonant

LEXICON k17
 k15 ; ! Standard, but also u-umlaut
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;

LEXICON k18 ! dansur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ; ! s-final
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;
 
LEXICON k19 ! meldur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k20 ! akur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k21 ! stuðul
 k19 ; ! Can't see the diffrence

LEXICON k22 ! himmal
 k19 ; ! Can't see the diffrence

LEXICON k23 ! róður
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k24 ! fløttur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k25 ! vøllur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k26 ! táttur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k27 ! vøkstur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k28 ! dráttur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k29 ! tráður

+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUMLr S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k30 ! fótur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-UR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k31 ! veggur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k32 ! ryggur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k33 ! hylur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k34 ! drongur
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k35 ! bonkur
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k36 ! heyggjur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k37 ! skógvur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDATm ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k38 ! bógvur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k39 ! sjógvur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k40 ! hógvur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k41 ! maður
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k42 ! dagur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k43 ! faðir
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k44 ! bróðir
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k45 ! spónur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k46 ! fjørður ! XXX start her.
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k47 ! sonur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k48 ! hamar
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k49 ! verkur
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k50 ! skjøldur (non-poetic)
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k51 ! luður
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k52 ! primus
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k53 ! aðal
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;


! Feminines
! ----------

LEXICON kv1 ! genta
+N+Fem: W-F-SGNOM ;
+N+Fem: W-F-SGOBL ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv2 ! bygd
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv3 ! søgn
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:      F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv4 ! fonn
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^OA F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:     F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv5 ! øld
+N+Fem:      S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:      F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:      F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv6 ! ár
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv7 ! vørr
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv8 ! egg
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv9 ! stong
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   F-PLGEN ;
